AnimUNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimUStem;

LEXICON AnimUStem

සැකකරු AnimUNoun;
සිසු AnimUNoun;
එළු AnimUNoun;
කොලු AnimUNoun;
බූරු AnimUNoun;
බැටළු AnimUNoun;

LEXICON AnimUNoun

+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:වා #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වාට #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:වෙක් #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:වෙකු #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වෙකුට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වෙකුහට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වෙක්ට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වෙක්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වෙකුගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වෙක්ගේ #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:වෝ#;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වෝට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වෝහට #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:වන් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වන්ට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වන්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Inanim:වන්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:වෝගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Inanim:වන්ගෙන් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:වාත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:වෝත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වාම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වාවත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Pl:වෝවත් #;
